sq_AL.aff
FLAG long
SFX L5 Y 45
SFX L5 ai atë ai po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ai atij ai po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ak eqën ak po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ak eqnish ak po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ak eqnit ak po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ak eqnëve ak po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ël li ël po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ël lin ël po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ël lit ël po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ëm mish ëm po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ëm mit ëm po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ëm mëve ëm po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ën ni ën po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ën nin ën po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ën nit ën po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ër rash ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ër rat ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ër rave ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ërr rri ërr po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ërr rrin ërr po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ërr rrit ërr po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ëv vi ëv po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ëv vin ëv po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ëv vit ëv po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 i a hi po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 i at hi po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 i ave hi po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 j u ej po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 j un ej po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 j ut ej po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ll j ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ll jsh ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ll jve ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L5 ua oi ua po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ua oin ua po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ua oit ua po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ul li ul po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ul lin ul po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ul lit ul po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ye eu ye po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ye eun ye po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 ye eut ye po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 uer ori uer po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 uer orin uer po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L5 uer orit uer po:noun is:sg is:mas

SFX L6 Y 30
SFX L6 a ej [lrt]a po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 a ejsh [lrt]a po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 a ejtë [lrt]a po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 a ejve [lrt]a po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 b pinj b po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 b pinjsh b po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 b pinjtë b po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 b pinjve b po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ë enj ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ë enjsh ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ë enjtë ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ë enjve ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 i ësh i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ll je ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ll jesh ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ll jet ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ll jeve ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 n j n po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 n jsh n po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 n jtë n po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 n jve n po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 r j r po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 r jsh r po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 r jtë ir po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 r jt ur po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 r jve r po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ua oje ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ua ojesh ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ua ojet ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L6 ua ojeve ua po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX L7 Y 29
SFX L7 ë allarë ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ë allarësh ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ë allarët ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ë allarëve ë po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ër urë ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ër urësh ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ër urët ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ër urëve ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 i ët [lt]i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 i ëve [lt]i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 kall qelle kall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 kall qellesh kall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 kall qellet kall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 kall qelleve kall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ua onj ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ua onjsh ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ua onjtë ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ua onjve ua po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 a erë na po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 a erësh na po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 a erët na po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 a erëve na po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ët tish ët po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ët tit ët po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 ët tëve ët po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 uall olle uall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 uall ollesh uall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 uall ollet uall po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L7 uall olleve uall po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX L8 Y 33
SFX L8 0 je [aeouy] po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 do ndo do po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 do tdo do po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 ë a ë po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 ë e ë po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 ëm mi ëm po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 ëm min ëm po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 ëm mit ëm po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 ër ro ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 ër rosh ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 ër rot ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 ër rove ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 ërr rrish ërr po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 ërr rrit ërr po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 i ez i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 i eztë i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 i ezve i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 k q k po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 k qve k po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 l j [au]l po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 l jsh [au]l po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 l jve [au]l po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 uaj onin aj po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 uaj onit aj po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 uall olli all po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 uall ollin all po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 uall ollit all po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 uar ori ar po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 uar orin ar po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 uar orit ar po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L8 uar orë ar po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 uar orësh ar po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L8 uar orët ar po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX L9 Y 14
SFX L9 0 nin [aeiuy] po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 0 nit [aeiuy] po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ab ebër ab po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ab ebërish ab po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ab ebërit ab po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ab ebërve ab po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ë in ë po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ë it ë po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ër ri ër po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ër rin ër po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ërr rri ërr po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 ërr rrin ërr po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX L9 k qish k po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX L9 k qit k po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX M1 Y 7
SFX M1 e a e po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M1 ë i ë po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M1 ër ra ër po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M1 i ash i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M1 in it in po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M1 ll jt ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M1 tdo vedo do po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX M2 Y 9
SFX M2 e ja e po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M2 ër i tër po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M2 i ë i po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M2 k qsh k po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M2 k qtë k po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M2 l jtë al po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M2 l jt ul po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M2 ll jtë ll po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M2 o ua o po:noun is:sg is:mas

SFX M3 Y 5
SFX M3 0 a [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M3 0 ash [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M3 0 at [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M3 0 ave [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M3 0 në [aeiouy] po:noun is:sg is:mas

SFX M4 Y 6
SFX M4 0 a i po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M4 0 ja [aeouy] po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M4 0 e [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M4 0 esh [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M4 0 et [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M4 0 eve [^aeiouy] po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX M5 Y 126
SFX M5 0 enjëtë t po:num
SFX M5 0 enjëta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 enjëtën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 enjëtës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 enjëti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 enjëtin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 enjëtit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 edytë t po:num
SFX M5 0 edyta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 edytën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 edytës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 edyti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 edytin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 edytit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 etretë t po:num
SFX M5 0 etreta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 etretën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 etretës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 etreti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 etretin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 etretit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 ekatërt t po:num
SFX M5 0 ekatërta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 ekatërtën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 ekatërtës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 ekatërti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 ekatërtin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 ekatërtit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 epestë t po:num
SFX M5 0 epesta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 epestën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 epestës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 epesti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 epestin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 epestit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 egjashtë t po:num
SFX M5 0 egjashta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 egjashtën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 egjashtës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 egjashti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 egjashtin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 egjashtit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 eshtatë t po:num
SFX M5 0 eshtata t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 eshtatën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 eshtatës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 eshtati t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 eshtatin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 eshtatit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 etetë t po:num
SFX M5 0 eteta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 etetën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 etetës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 eteti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 etetin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 etetit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 enëntë t po:num
SFX M5 0 enënta t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 enëntën t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 enëntës t po:num is:fem
SFX M5 0 enënti t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 enëntin t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 0 enëntit t po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë enjëtë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë enjëta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë enjëtën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë enjëtës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë enjëti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë enjëtin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë enjëtit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë edytë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë edyta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë edytën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë edytës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë edyti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë edytin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë edytit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë etretë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë etreta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë etretën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë etretës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë etreti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë etretin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë etretit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë ekatërt ë po:num
SFX M5 ë ekatërta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë ekatërtën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë ekatërtës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë ekatërti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë ekatërtin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë ekatërtit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë epestë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë epesta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë epestën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë epestës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë epesti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë epestin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë epestit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë egjashtë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë egjashta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë egjashtën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë egjashtës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë egjashti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë egjashtin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë egjashtit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë eshtatë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë eshtata ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë eshtatën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë eshtatës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë eshtati ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë eshtatin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë eshtatit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë etetë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë eteta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë etetën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë etetës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë eteti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë etetin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë etetit ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë enëntë ë po:num
SFX M5 ë enënta ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë enëntën ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë enëntës ë po:num is:fem
SFX M5 ë enënti ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë enëntin ë po:num is:mas
SFX M5 ë enëntit ë po:num is:mas

SFX M6 Y 2
SFX M6 0 ish [çhlmrst] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M6 0 sh [abeëijnoquyz] po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX M7 Y 15
SFX M7 0 enj [hl] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 enjsh [hl] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 enjtë [hl] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 enjve [hl] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 ërinj [fho]t po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 ërinjsh [fho]t po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 ërinjtë [fho]t po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 ërinjve [fho]t po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 rë [aeiu] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 rësh [aeiu] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 rët [aeiu] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 0 rëve [aeiu] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M7 ër rit ër po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M7 ërr rrit ërr po:noun is:sg is:mas
SFX M7 të ve të po:noun is:pl is:mas

SFX M8 Y 2
SFX M8 0 ë [^aiuy] po:noun is:pl is:mas
SFX M8 0 së [aiuy] po:noun is:sg is:mas
